Hawaii statutes.
[§342D-36] Treatment of single operational
upset. For the purpose of this part, a single operational upset which
leads to simultaneous violations of more than one water pollutant parameter
shall be treated as a single violation. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next